Utah statutes.
31A-21-403.   Orders terminating effectiveness of policies.

Upon the commissioner's order, no mass marketed life or accident and health insurance issued by an insurer may continue to be effected on persons in this state.  The commissioner may issue an order under this section only if the commissioner finds, after a hearing, that the total charges for the insurance to the persons insured are unreasonable in relation to the benefits provided.  The commissioner's findings under this section shall be in writing.  Orders under this section may direct the insurer to cease effecting the insurance until the total charges for the insurance are found by the commissioner to be reasonable in relation to the benefits provided.

